Maryland, session 2026, HB0857.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–207.
(a) To the extent included in federal adjusted gross income, the amounts under
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0857*

HOUSE BILL 857
this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to determine
Maryland adjusted gross income.
(q) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Armed forces” has the meaning stated in § 9–901 of the State
Government Article.
(iii) “Military retirement income” means retirement income,
including death benefits, received as a result of military service.
(iv) “Military service” means:
1. induction into the armed forces for training and service
under the Selective Training and Service Act of 1940 or a subsequent act of a similar
nature;
2. membership in a reserve component;
3. membership in an active component of the armed forces;
or
4. active duty with the commissioned corps of the Public
Health Service, the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, or the Coast and
Geodetic Survey.
(2) The subtraction under subsection (a) of this section includes[:
(i) if, on the last day of the taxable year, the individual is under the
age of 55 years, the first $12,500 of military retirement income received by an individual
during the taxable year; and
(ii) if, on the last day of the taxable year, the individual is at least 55
years old,] the first $20,000 of military retirement income received by an individual during
the taxable year.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.